North Carolina, session 2025, HB1113.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

EXTEND SHELLFISH LEASE MORATORIUM IN THE NEW HANOVER COUNTY
AREA
SECTION 1.(a) Section 7 of S.L. 2019-37, as amended by Section 12.3 of S.L.
2021-180, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7. Notwithstanding G.S. 113-202 and G.S. 113-202.1, a moratorium on new
shellfish cultivation leases and new water column leases for aquaculture shall be imposed for all
those waters enclosed by a line beginning at 34° 13.10221' N -77° 48.79544' W on the mainland
side near Wrightsville Beach Bridge; running southeasterly to a point at 34° 12.51584' N -77°
47.81847' W on Wrightsville Beach; following the shoreline southwesterly to a point at 34°
11.121' N -77° 48.848' W at Masonboro Inlet; running southwesterly to a point at 34° 10.927'
N -77° 48.771' W at Masonboro Inlet; continuing southwesterly to a point at 34° 05.04108' N -77°
52.08324' W near IWW marker #159 continuing running southwesterly to a point at 34°
03.64140' N -77° 53.41338' W on the mainland adjacent to the eastern mouth of Snow's Cut;
running northeasterly along the shoreline to the point of beginning. The moratorium shall expire
July 1, 2026. July 1, 2031. For purposes of this section, a new shellfish cultivation lease or water
column lease shall include applications for either type of lease received by the Secretary but not
granted as of July 1, 2019."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026, and applies to the
Department's consideration of applications for shellfish leases submitted to the Department on or
after that date as well as applications for a new shellfish cultivation lease or a new water column
lease received by the Secretary, but not granted as of July 1, 2019.
SECTION 2. The sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality, Division of Marine Fisheries, for public education activities and other
notifications regarding the moratorium extension provided in Section 1 of this act.

EXTEND SHELLFISH LEASE MORATORIUM IN BOGUE SOUND
*H1113-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.5.(a) Section 8 of S.L. 2019-37, as amended by Section 12.3 of S.L.
2021-180, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 8. Notwithstanding G.S. 113-202 and G.S. 113-202.1, a moratorium on new
shellfish cultivation leases and new water column leases for aquaculture shall be imposed for all
those waters enclosed by a line beginning at 34° 43.24641' N -76° 41.68436' W; running easterly
following the Highway 70 High Rise Bridge to a point at 34° 43.27819' N -76° 41.22259' W;
running southerly to a point 34° 42.375275' N -76° 40.80078' W on the southern tip of Radio
Island; running southerly to a point 34° 41.98273' N -76° 40.81929' W; following the shoreline
westerly to the Emerald Isle Bridge at a point 34° 40.05410' N -77° 03.80531' W; running
northwesterly following the bridge to a point 34° 40.77658' N -77° 04.02674' W on the mainland
near the Emerald Isle High Rise Bridge; running easterly following the shoreline to the point of
beginning. The moratorium shall expire July 1, 2026. July 1, 2028. For purposes of this section,
a new shellfish cultivation lease or water column lease shall include applications for either type
of lease received by the Secretary, but not granted as of July 1, 2019."
SECTION 2.5.(b) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026, and applies to the
Department's consideration of applications for shellfish leases submitted to the Department on or
after that date as well as applications for a new shellfish cultivation lease or a new water column
lease received by the Secretary, but not granted as of July 1, 2019.

PROHIBIT NEW SHELLFISH LEASES IN PARTS OF PENDER AND ONSLOW
COUNTIES
SECTION 3.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 113-202 and G.S. 113-202.1, a moratorium
on new shellfish cultivation leases and new water column leases for aquaculture shall be imposed
for all those waters enclosed by a line beginning at the southeast end post of the northern fenceline
of Hampstead Marina, approximately 7.0' due east to the Point of Beginning on the Mean High
Water (MHW) Line at W77°41'05" N34°21'20", thence following the MHW Line northeastward
along mainland Pender County to the Onslow County line, thence following the MHW Line ENE
along mainland Onslow County to the intersection of the MHW Line with the Jones Onslow
Electric Cooperative (JOECO) ROW at W77°22'20" N34°31'06", thence SSE to the northeast tip
of the rock revetment in the JOECO ROW on Topsail Island, thence following the sound side
MHW line of Topsail Island WSW to its furthest southern extent at W77°39'42" N34°20'42",
thence WNW to the southern marsh edge of the east entrance to Howard's Channel at W77°40'26"
N34°20'49", thence through the following coordinates W77°40'33" N34°20'48", W77°40'48"
N34°21'00", W77°40'49" N34°21'06", W77°40'53" N34°21'12", W77°40'57" N34°21'12" along
the marsh edge, thence NW to the point of beginning. The moratorium shall expire July 1, 2028.
For purposes of this section, a new shellfish cultivation lease or water column lease shall include
applications for either type of lease received by the Secretary, but not granted as of July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to the
Department's consideration of applications for shellfish leases submitted to the Department on or
after that date as well as applications for a new shellfish cultivation lease or a new water column
lease received by the Secretary, but not granted as of July 1, 2025.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1113-Third Edition